District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.13

Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in the District.

(a)

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in the District and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of the District has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

(b)

A tribunal of the District exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of subchapters I and II of this chapter, and the procedural and substantive law of the District to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Subchapters III, IV, V, VII, and VIII of this chapter do not apply.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 613
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(m), 45 DCR 2924
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 145, 47 DCR 520

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-306.10 and § 46-306.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.13.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 deleted the phrase “of this chapter” following the enumeration of subchapters.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(m) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(m) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(m) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 613 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).